Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 72.09.015 and 2022 c 254 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Adult basic education" means education or instruction designed to achieve general competence of skills in reading, writing, and oral communication, including English as a second language and preparation and testing services for obtaining a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536.(2) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level of field services the department of corrections is required by statute to provide for the supervision and monitoring of ((offenders))incarcerated individuals.(3) "Civil judgment for assault" means a civil judgment for monetary damages awarded to a correctional officer or department employee entered by a court of competent jurisdiction against an inmate that is based on, or arises from, injury to the correctional officer or department employee caused by the inmate while the correctional officer or department employee was acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.(4) "Community custody" has the same meaning as that provided in RCW 9.94A.030 and also includes community placement and community supervision as defined in RCW 9.94B.020.(5) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the control of the secretary.(6) "Correctional facility" means a facility or institution operated directly or by contract by the secretary for the purposes of incarcerating adults in total or partial confinement, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.(7) "County" means a county or combination of counties.(8) "Department" means the department of corrections.(9) "Earned early release" means earned release as authorized by RCW 9.94A.729.(10) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple-site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective in reducing recidivism for the population.(11) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit between an inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that occurs in a private visiting unit located at the correctional facility where the inmate is confined.(12) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules and policies.(13) "Good performance" means successful completion of a program required by the department, including an education, work, or other program.(14) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children, stepchildren, grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents, great grandparents, siblings, aunts, uncles, and a person legally married to or in a state registered domestic partnership with an inmate. "Immediate family" includes the immediate family of an inmate who was adopted as a child or an adult, but does not include an inmate adopted by another inmate.(15) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean an inmate who has less than a $25 balance of disposable income in his or her institutional account on the day a request is made to utilize funds and during the 30 days previous to the request.(16) "Individual reentry plan" means the plan to prepare an ((offender))incarcerated person for release into the community. It should be developed collaboratively between the department and the ((offender))incarcerated person and based on an assessment of the ((offender))person using a standardized and comprehensive tool to identify the ((offender's))person's risks and needs. The individual reentry plan describes actions that should occur to prepare individual ((offenders))incarcerated persons for release from prison or jail, specifies the supervision and services they will experience in the community, and describes ((an offender's))a person's eventual discharge to aftercare upon successful completion of supervision. An individual reentry plan is updated throughout the period of ((an offender's))a person's incarceration and supervision to be relevant to the ((offender's))person's current needs and risks.(17) "Inmate" ((means))and "incarcerated person" mean a person committed to the custody of the department, including but not limited to persons residing in a correctional institution or facility and persons released from such facility on furlough, work release, or community custody, and persons received from another state, state agency, county, federally recognized tribe, or federal jurisdiction.(18) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix.(19) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or physical intervention to control an ((offender))incarcerated person or limit an ((offender's))incarcerated person's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited force and designed to:(a) Prevent an ((offender))incarcerated person from completing an act that would result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;(b) Remove a disruptive ((offender))incarcerated person who is unwilling to leave the area voluntarily; or(c) Guide an ((offender))incarcerated person from one location to another.(20) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a ((woman or youth))person is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician or certified nurse midwife determines is necessary for healing after the ((woman or youth))person leaves the hospital, birthing center, or clinic.(21) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the department is required to provide under the state or federal Constitution or under state or federal law.(22) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents, based on preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice.(23) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.(24) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:(a) Physical restraint; or(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.(25) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her designee.(26) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into a new product line or service to the class I business that results from an increase in benefits provided by the department, including a decrease in labor costs, rent, or utility rates (for water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), an increase in work program space, tax advantages, or other overhead costs.(27) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state department of corrections, or his or her designee.(28) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an incarcerated pregnant ((woman or youth))person from the correctional facility to another location from the moment ((she))the person leaves the correctional facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated ((woman or youth))person from the correctional facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to the other location.(29) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive advantage that a business may acquire as a result of a correctional industries contract, including labor costs, rent, tax advantages, utility rates (water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), and other overhead costs. To determine net competitive advantage, the department of corrections shall review and quantify any expenses unique to operating a for-profit business inside a prison.(30) "Vocational training" or "vocational education" means "vocational education" as defined in RCW 72.62.020.(31) "Washington business" means an in-state manufacturer or service provider subject to chapter 82.04 RCW existing on June 10, 2004.(32) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional industries jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.(33) "Administrative segregation" means the temporary removal from the general population of an incarcerated person who is deemed to present a threat to the safety and security of staff, the incarcerated population, or the community, until a timely and informed decision can be made about appropriate housing based on the incarcerated person's circumstance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) The circumstances or actions that may warrant administrative segregation in response to suspected prohibited conduct or disciplinary proceedings include the following:(a) Escape or attempted escape;(b) Arson or attempted arson;(c) Assault resulting in serious physical injury or attempted assault that would have resulted in serious physical injury, including assault of department staff;(d) Creating or participating in a major disturbance in which assaults occurred or were attempted; and (e) Reliable and specific intelligence that one of these events is likely and imminent unless particular individuals are removed from the general population.(2) Medical necessity may justify placing an individual temporarily in close observation areas or infirmaries under medical supervision but does not justify administrative segregation status.(3) The department will evaluate its practices and policies for administrative segregation with a goal of reducing placement to 15 days or less.(a) If administrative segregation is extended past 30 calendar days, the department will update the individual on their status and the reasons for extended placement.(b) Extensions of administrative segregation beyond 45 calendar days require authorization by the secretary or designee and a written explanation as to why the extension is needed.(c) The department must notify the office of the corrections ombuds in writing any time a person has remained on administrative segregation for more than 45 consecutive days.(4) An incarcerated person may not lose housing, education, or work assignments, or other programming assignments solely due to placement on administrative segregation unless documented institutional or programmatic needs require such removal or change.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) An incarcerated person is presumed innocent of an infraction or alleged rule violation and the facility has the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the alleged conduct occurred.(2) In a disciplinary hearing, the hearing officer must articulate what evidence supports the officer's finding, and a summary of the facts and evidence supporting the decision must be recorded in the disciplinary hearing minutes and findings or other similar form.(3) For the purpose of this section, "preponderance of the evidence" means the greater weight of credible evidence, not necessarily established by the amount of evidence or number of witnesses, but by that evidence that has the most indicia of reliability and convincing force.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:By January 31, 2026, and by January 31 every year thereafter, the department must post on its website an annual report on its use of administrative segregation. That report shall include, but not be limited to:(1) The total number of administrative segregation placements during the prior year;(2) The number of administrative segregation placements during the prior year due to suspected prohibited behavior or the disciplinary process;(3) The number of administrative segregation placements during the prior year for each of the following reasons:(a) Threat to safety and security of others;(b) Threat to orderliness of the facility;(c) Housing assignment refusal;(d) Contraband; or(e) Other;(4) The number of temporary administrative segregation placements during the prior year for each of the following nondisciplinary reasons:(a) Medical hold;(b) Transport or classification delay; or(c) Protective custody;(5)(a) The mean and median length of an individual's stay in administrative segregation during the prior year; and(b) If the median length of stay is more than 15 days, any steps the department has taken in the prior year to decrease that length of stay and what, if any, additional resources are needed in order to achieve its goal of 15 days or less in administrative segregation;(6) If the circumstances that led to an administrative segregation placement that the department reported under subsection (3)(a) of this section involved conduct by an incarcerated individual and a victim or attempted victim, the report shall also include whether the victim or attempted victim was a department employee or staff or an incarcerated individual and whether medical aid was provided or required.--- END ---